Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 4. Sexual Offenses.

Cross references. —

For authority of court to order a defendant to submit to a blood test when sexual penetration is an element of the offense, see AS

18.15.300

.

For authority of court to order a defendant to submit to a blood test when sexual penetration is an element of the offense, see AS

18.15.300

.

Sec. 11.41.410.
Sexual assault in the first degree.

An offender commits the crime of sexual assault in the first degree if

the offender engages in sexual penetration with another person without consent of that person;

the offender attempts to engage in sexual penetration with another person without consent of that person and causes serious physical injury to that person;

the offender engages in sexual penetration with another person

who the offender knows is mentally incapable; and

who is in the offender’s care

by authority of law; or

in a facility or program that is required by law to be licensed by the state; or

the offender engages in sexual penetration with a person who the offender knows is unaware that a sexual act is being committed and

the offender is a health care worker; and

the offense takes place during the course of professional treatment of the victim.

Sexual assault in the first degree is an unclassified felony and is punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 4 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

Defense to AS

11.41.410(a)(3)

(sexual assault on the mentally incapable) - AS

11.41.432

Definition of “sexual penetration” -
AS

11.81.900(b)

(

Note

: This definition and accompanying commentary is reprinted immediately following
AS

11.41.470

.)

Definition of “serious physical injury” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “without consent”, “mentally incapable”-AS

11.41.470

Sexual assault in the second degree - AS

11.41.420

Sexual abuse of a minor in the first, second, third and fourth degree - AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

General provisions (mistake of age; spousal immunity)-AS

11.41.445

Incest - AS

11.41.450

Assault in the first, second, third and fourth degree-AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Offenses defined by age or value - AS

11.81.615

Statute of limitations in prosecutions under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

- AS

12.10.020(c)

TD: I, 78-80, 84-88.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(i)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For evidence of past sexual conduct in trials of sexual assault in any degree or attempt to commit sexual assault in any degree, see AS

12.45.045

.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

For legislative letter of intent relating to the amendments to (a) of this section by ch. 96, SLA 1988 (CSHB 545 (Jud)), see 1988 House Journal 3065.

Sec. 11.41.420.
Sexual assault in the second degree.

An offender commits the crime of sexual assault in the second degree if

the offender engages in sexual contact with another person without consent of that person;

the offender engages in sexual contact with a person

who the offender knows is mentally incapable; and

who is in the offender’s care

by authority of law; or

in a facility or program that is required by law to be licensed by the state;

the offender engages in sexual penetration with a person who is

mentally incapable;

incapacitated; or

unaware that a sexual act is being committed; or

the offender engages in sexual contact with a person who the offender knows is unaware that a sexual act is being committed and

the offender is a health care worker; and

the offense takes place during the course of professional treatment of the victim.

Sexual assault in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 96 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 4 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 61 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125

(e) and (i) for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “the offender knows” following “a person who” in (a)(3).

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of paragraph (a)(3) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent relating to the amendments to (a) of this section by ch. 96, SLA 1988 (CSHB 545 (Jud)), see 1988 House Journal 3065.

Sec. 11.41.425.
Sexual assault in the third degree.

An offender commits the crime of sexual assault in the third degree if the offender

engages in sexual contact with a person who is

mentally incapable;

incapacitated; or

unaware that a sexual act is being committed;

while employed in a state correctional facility or other placement designated by the commissioner of corrections for the custody and care of prisoners, engages in sexual penetration with a person who the offender knows is committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections to serve a term of imprisonment or period of temporary commitment;

engages in sexual penetration with a person 18 or 19 years of age who the offender knows is committed to the custody of the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.10 or AS 47.12 and the offender is the legal guardian of the person;

while employed in the state by a law enforcement agency as a peace officer, or while acting as a peace officer in the state, engages in sexual penetration with a person with reckless disregard that the person is in the custody or the apparent custody of the offender, or is committed to the custody of a law enforcement agency;

while employed by the state or a municipality of the state as a probation officer or parole officer, or while acting as a probation officer or parole officer in the state, engages in sexual penetration with a person with reckless disregard that the person is on probation or parole; or

while employed as a juvenile probation officer or as a juvenile facility staff, engages in sexual penetration with a person 18 or 19 years of age with reckless disregard that the person is committed to the custody or probationary supervision of the Department of Health and Social Services.

In this section,

“juvenile facility staff” means a person employed in a juvenile detention facility or juvenile treatment facility as those terms are defined in AS

47.12.990

;

“juvenile probation officer” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“parole officer” has the meaning given in AS

18.65.290

;

“peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

;

“probation officer” includes a

probation officer as defined in AS

18.65.290

; or

person who supervises a participant in a specialty court, including a therapeutic or wellness court addressing alcohol or drug use, a court addressing the needs of veterans, an adult or juvenile mental health court, a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder court, or a family care or preservation court.

Sexual assault in the third degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 96 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 4 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2000; am §§ 3, 4 ch 20 SLA 2011; am §§ 3, 4 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 5 ch 4 FSSLA 2019; am §§ 2, 3 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

Defense to AS

11.41.420(a)(2)

and

11.41.425

(sexual assault on the mentally incapable) - AS

11.41.432

Definition of “sexual contact,” “sexual penetration” -
AS

11.81.900(b)

(

Note:

These definitions and accompanying commentary are reprinted immediately following
AS

11.41.470

.)

Definition of “mentally incapable” - AS

11.41.470

Definition of “physical injury” -
AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” -
AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “incapacitated,” “without consent” - AS

11.41.470

Sexual assault in the first degree - AS

11.41.410

Assault in the first, second, third and fourth degree-AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Harassment - AS

11.61.120(a)(5)

Statute of limitations in prosecutions under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

- AS

12.10.020(c)

TD: I, 77-78.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125

(e) and (i) for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), amending (a) of this section, see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c).
Relettered in 2011, at which time former subsection (b) was relettered as (c).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “the offender knows” following “a person who” in (a)(1).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (b)(1), substituted “juvenile detention facility or juvenile treatment facility as those terms are defined in AS 46.12.990” for “juvenile detention or treatment facility” at the end, in (b)(2), substituted “has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

” for “means a person assigned to supervise another person 18 or 19 years of age who is committed to the probationary supervision of the department of health and social services” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (a) and (b) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of paragraph (a)(1) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Section 57(a),
ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendments of (b)(1) and (b)(2) of this section “apply to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2021.” Section 57(b),
ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendments of (b)(1) and (b)(2) of this section apply to minors subject to
AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22,
ch. 16, SLA 2021, and
AS

47.12.100

“who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter concerning the amendment of subsection (a) by § 1,
ch. 33, SLA 2000 (HB 99), see 1999 House Journal 256.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), which amended (b)(1) and (b)(2) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.

Sec. 11.41.427.
Sexual assault in the fourth degree.

An offender commits the crime of sexual assault in the fourth degree if

while employed in a state correctional facility or other placement designated by the commissioner of corrections for the custody and care of prisoners, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person who the offender knows is committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections to serve a term of imprisonment or period of temporary commitment;

the offender engages in sexual contact with a person 18 or 19 years of age who the offender knows is committed to the custody of the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.10 or AS 47.12 and the offender is the legal guardian of the person;

while employed in the state by a law enforcement agency as a peace officer, or while acting as a peace officer in the state, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person with reckless disregard that the person is in the custody or the apparent custody of the offender, or is committed to the custody of a law enforcement agency;

while employed by the state or a municipality of the state as a probation officer or parole officer, or while acting as a probation officer or parole officer in the state, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person with reckless disregard that the person is on probation or parole; or

while employed as a juvenile probation officer or as a juvenile facility staff, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person 18 or 19 years of age with reckless disregard that the person is committed to the custody or probationary supervision of the Department of Health and Social Services.

In this section,

“juvenile facility staff” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.425

;

“juvenile probation officer” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“parole officer” has the meaning given in AS

18.65.290

;

“peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

;

“probation officer” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.425

.

Sexual assault in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 33 SLA 2000; am §§ 5, 6 ch 20 SLA 2011; am §§ 5, 6 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 4 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c).
Relettered in 2011, at which time former subsection (b) was relettered as (c).

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, at the end of (b)(2), substituted “AS

47.12.990

” for “AS

11.41.425

”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (a) and (b) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Section 57(a), ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (b)(2) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2021.” Section 57(b), ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (b)(2) of this section applies to minors subject to AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22, ch. 16, SLA 2021, and AS

47.12.100

“who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by § 2,
ch. 33, SLA 2000 (HB 99), see 1999 House Journal 256.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), which amended (b)(2) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.

Sec. 11.41.430.
Sexual assault in the third degree. [Repealed, § 10 ch 78 SLA 1983.
For current law, see AS 11.41.425.]

Sec. 11.41.432.
Defenses.

It is a defense to a crime charged under AS

11.41.410(a)(3)

,

11.41.420(a)(2)

,

11.41.420(a)(3)

,

11.41.425

, or

11.41.427

that the offender is

mentally incapable.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

Except as provided in (d) or (e) of this section, in a prosecution under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.427

, it is not a defense that the victim was, at the time of the alleged offense, the legal spouse of the defendant.

It is an affirmative defense to a crime charged under AS

11.41.425(a)(5)

or

11.41.427(a)(4)

that

the offender and the person on probation or parole had, before the person was placed on probation or parole, a dating relationship or a sexual relationship that continued until the date of the alleged offense; and

the person on probation or parole consented to the act for which the offender is charged.

It is a defense to a crime charged under AS

11.41.425(a)(2)

— (6) or

11.41.427

that the offender is married to the person, neither party has filed with the court for separation, divorce, or dissolution of the marriage, and the person consented to the act for which the offender was charged.

It is an affirmative defense for a crime charged under AS

11.41.410(a)(3)

,

11.41.420(a)(2)

,

11.41.420(a)(3)(A)

, or

11.41.425(a)(1)(A)

that the offender is married to the person, neither party has filed with the court for separation, divorce, or dissolution of the marriage, and the person consented to the act for which the offender is charged while capable of understanding the nature or consequences of the offender’s conduct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 96 SLA 1988; am § 27 ch 50 SLA 1989; am §§ 7, 8 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § § 6 — 8, 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of mentally incapable - AS

11.41.470

Sexual assault in the first, second and third degree - AS 11.41.41 —

11.41.425

For definitions of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, repealed (a)(2); in (b), substituted “in (d) or (e) of this section, in a prosecution under AS

11.41.410

–

11.41.427

” for “in (a) of this section, in a prosecution under AS

11.41.410

or

11.41.420

”; in (c), added the (1) designation, substituted “relationship that continued until the date of the alleged offense; and” for “relationship, and the relationship continued until the date of the alleged offense,” added (c)(2), and made related stylistic changes; added (d) and (e).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For an analysis of the 1989 amendment to this section, see Senate-House Joint Journal Supplement No. 10, May 5, 1989, p. 5, under “Sec. 27.”

Sec. 11.41.434.
Sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree.

An offender commits the crime of sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree if

being 16 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual penetration with a person who is under 13 years of age or aids, induces, causes, or encourages a person who is under 13 years of age to engage in sexual penetration with another person;

being 18 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual penetration with a person who is under 18 years of age, and the offender is the victim’s natural parent, stepparent, adopted parent, or legal guardian; or

being 18 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual penetration with a person who is under 16 years of age, and

the victim at the time of the offense is residing in the same household as the offender and the offender has authority over the victim; or

the offender occupies a position of authority in relation to the victim.

Sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree is an unclassified felony and is punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125

(e) and (i) for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent on ch. 66, SLA 1988 (CSHB 237 (Jud)), which amended this section, see 1988 House Journal 2330-2333.

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the amendment of subsection (a) by § 1, ch. 151, SLA 1990 (HCS CSSB 355 (Jud)), see 1990 House Journal, p. 4199.

Sec. 11.41.436.
Sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree.

An offender commits the crime of sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree if,

being 17 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual penetration with a person who is 13, 14, or 15 years of age and at least four years younger than the offender, or aids, induces, causes, or encourages a person who is 13, 14, or 15 years of age and at least four years younger than the offender to engage in sexual penetration with another person;

being 16 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person who is under 13 years of age or aids, induces, causes, or encourages a person under 13 years of age to engage in sexual contact with another person;

being 18 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person who is under 18 years of age, and the offender is the victim’s natural parent, stepparent, adopted parent, or legal guardian;

being 16 years of age or older, the offender aids, induces, causes, or encourages a person who is under 16 years of age to engage in conduct described in AS

11.41.455(a)(2)

— (6);

being 18 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person who is under 16 years of age, and

the victim at the time of the offense is residing in the same household as the offender and the offender has authority over the victim; or

the offender occupies a position of authority in relation to the victim;

being 18 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual penetration with a person who is 16 or 17 years of age and at least three years younger than the offender, and the offender occupies a position of authority in relation to the victim; or

being under 16 years of age, the offender engages in sexual penetration with a person who is under 13 years of age and at least three years younger than the offender.

Sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 151 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125

(e) and (i) for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 14, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after April 28, 2006.”
Section 3, ch. 88, SLA 2006 provides that the amendment to (a)(6) made by sec. 1, ch. 88, SLA 2006 applies “to offenses occurring on or after October 4, 2006.”

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent on ch. 66, SLA 1988 (CSHB 237 (Jud)), which amended this section, see 1988 House Journal 2330-2333.

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the amendment of subsection (a) by § 2, ch. 151, SLA 1990 (HCS CSSB 355 (Jud)), see 1990 House Journal, p. 4199.

Sec. 11.41.438.
Sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree.

An offender commits the crime of sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree if being 17 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person who is 13, 14, or 15 years of age and at least four years younger than the offender.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree is a class C felony, punishable as provided in AS

12.55.125(e)

.

Sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree is a class C felony, punishable under AS

12.55.125(i)

, if, at the time of the offense, the victim was at least six years younger than the offender.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 151 SLA 1990; am § 14 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 14 SLA 2006; am §§
9, 10 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125

(e) and (i) for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (b), which read, “Sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree is a class C felony.”; added (c).

Editor's notes. —

Section 32(a), ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004.”

Section 13, ch. 14, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after April 28, 2006.”

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of subsection (b) and the addition of subsection (c) applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the amendment of subsection (a) by § 3, ch. 151, SLA 1990 (HCS CSSB 355 (Jud)), see 1990 House Journal, p. 4199.

Sec. 11.41.440.
Sexual abuse of a minor in the fourth degree.

An offender commits the crime of sexual abuse of a minor in the fourth degree if

being under 16 years of age, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person who is under 13 years of age and at least three years younger than the offender; or

being 18 years of age or older, the offender engages in sexual contact with a person who is 16 or 17 years of age and at least three years younger than the offender, and the offender occupies a position of authority in relation to the victim.

Sexual abuse of a minor in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 151 SLA 1990; am § 15 ch 124 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

Definition of “legal guardian,” “position of authority” - AS

11.41.470

Definition of “sexual penetration,” “sexual contact” -
AS

11.81.900(b)

, (

Note:

These definitions and accompanying commentary are reprinted immediately following
AS

11.41.470

.)

Sexual assault in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.410

,

11.41.420

General provisions (mistake of age) - AS

11.41.445(b)

Incest - AS

11.41.450

Offenses defined by age or value - AS

11.81.615

Statute of limitations in prosecutions under AS

11.41.410

—11.41.460 - AS

12.10.020(c)

Defenses to sexual assault on the mentally incapable - AS

11.41.432

Original Code Provision - AS

11.41.445(a)

.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 32(a), ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004.”

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the amendment of subsection (a) by § 4, ch. 151, SLA 1990 (HCS CSSB 355 (Jud)), see 1990 House Journal, p. 4199.

Sec. 11.41.443.
Spousal relationship no defense. [Repealed, § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989. For current law, see AS 11.41.432(b).]

Sec. 11.41.445.
General provisions.

In a prosecution under AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

it is an affirmative defense that, at the time of the alleged offense, the victim was the legal spouse of the defendant unless the offense was committed without the consent of the victim.

In a prosecution under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.440

, whenever a provision of law defining an offense depends upon a victim’s being under a certain age, it is an affirmative defense that, at the time of the alleged offense, the defendant

reasonably believed the victim to be that age or older; and

undertook reasonable measures to verify that the victim was that age or older.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “physical injury” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “victim” - AS

11.41.470

Spousal relationship no defense - AS

11.41.443

Sexual assault in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.410

,

11.41.420

Sexual abuse of a minor in the first, second, third and fourth degree - AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

Assault in the first, second, third and fourth degree-AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Offenses defined by age or value - AS

11.81.615

Sec. 11.41.450.
Incest.

A person commits the crime of incest if, being 18 years of age or older, that person engages in sexual penetration with another who is related, either legitimately or illegitimately, as

an ancestor or descendant of the whole or half blood;

a brother or sister of the whole or half blood; or

an uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece by blood.

Incest is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “sexual penetration” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Sexual abuse of a minor in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.434(a)(2)

,

11.41.436(a)(3)

Statute of limitations in prosecutions under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

- AS

12.10.020(c)

Original Code Provision - AS 11.40.110.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125

(e) and (i) for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.41.452.
Enticement of a minor.

A person commits the crime of enticement of a minor if the person, being 18 years of age or older, knowingly communicates with another person to entice, solicit, or encourage the person to engage in an act described in AS

11.41.455(a)(1)

— (7) and

the other person is a child under 16 years of age; or

the person believes that the other person is a child under 16 years of age.

In a prosecution under (a)(2) of this section, it is not a defense that the person enticed, solicited, or encouraged was not actually a child under 16 years of age.

In a prosecution under this section, it is not necessary for the prosecution to show that the act described in AS

11.41.455(a)(1)

— (7) was actually committed.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, enticement of a minor is a class B felony.

Enticement of a minor is a class A felony if the defendant was, at the time of the offense, required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63 or a similar law of another jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 97 SLA 2005; am §§ 7, 8 ch 20 SLA 2011; am §§
11 — 13 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(i)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For jurisdiction over crimes under this section, see
AS

12.05.030

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), deleted “online” following “crime of” and substituted “knowingly communicates” for “knowingly uses a computer to communicate”; in (d), substituted “enticement of a minor is a class B felony” for “online enticement is a class B felony”; and in (e), substituted “Enticement of a minor” for “Online enticement” at the beginning.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 96, SLA 2005, provides that this section applies “to offenses occurring on or after November 28, 2005.”

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of subsections (a), (d), and (e) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.41.455.
Unlawful exploitation of a minor.

A person commits the crime of unlawful exploitation of a minor if, in the state and with the intent of producing a live performance, film, audio, video, electronic, or electromagnetic recording, photograph, negative, slide, book, newspaper, magazine, or other material that visually or aurally depicts the conduct listed in (1) — (7) of this subsection, the person knowingly induces or employs a child under 18 years of age to engage in, or photographs, films, records, or televises a child under 18 years of age engaged in, the following actual or simulated conduct:

sexual penetration;

the lewd touching of another person’s genitals, anus, or breast;

the lewd touching by another person of the child’s genitals, anus, or breast;

masturbation;

bestiality;

the lewd exhibition of the child’s genitals; or

sexual masochism or sadism.

A parent, legal guardian, or person having custody or control of a child under 18 years of age commits the crime of unlawful exploitation of a minor if, in the state, the person permits the child to engage in conduct described in (a) of this section knowing that the conduct is intended to be used in producing a live performance, film, audio, video, electronic, or electromagnetic recording, photograph, negative, slide, book, newspaper, magazine, or other material that visually or aurally depicts the conduct.

Unlawful exploitation of a minor is

a class A felony; or

an unclassified felony if the

person has been previously convicted of unlawful exploitation of a minor in this jurisdiction or a similar crime in this or another jurisdiction; or

minor who is exploited is under 13 years of age at the time the exploitation occurs.

In this section, “audio recording” means a nonbook prerecorded item without a visual component, and includes a record, tape, cassette, and compact disc.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1983; am §§ 1 — 3, ch 161 SLA 1990; am § 8 ch 79 SLA 1992; am §§ 1, 2 ch 65 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 131 SLA 2004; am § 14 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “sexual penetration” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Sexual assault in the first degree - AS

11.41.410(a)(3)

Sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree - AS

11.41.436(a)(4)

Distribution of child pornography - AS

11.61.125

TD: V, 68-69.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(i)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For crime of distribution of child pornography, see AS

11.61.125

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (c), which read “Unlawful exploitation of a minor is a

“(1) class B felony; or

“(2) class A felony if the person has been previously convicted of unlawful exploitation of a minor in this jurisdiction or a similar crime in this or another jurisdiction.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of subsection (c) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.41.458.
Indecent exposure in the first degree.

An offender commits the crime of indecent exposure in the first degree if the offender violates AS

11.41.460(a)

and

while committing the act constituting the offense, the offender knowingly masturbates; or

the offender has been previously convicted under

this section;

AS

11.41.460(a)

; or

a law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with elements similar to a crime listed under (A) or (B) of this paragraph.

Indecent exposure in the first degree

is a class C felony; or

is a class B felony if the offense occurs within the observation of a person under 16 years of age.

History.

(§ 3 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2005; am § 15 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment for class B felonies, AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, the offense occurs within the observation of a person under 16 years of age,” following “AS

11.41.460(a)

” in the introductory paragraph of (a); and rewrote (b), which read, “Indecent exposure in the first degree is a class C felony.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.41.460.
Indecent exposure in the second degree.

An offender commits the crime of indecent exposure in the second degree if the offender knowingly exposes the offender’s genitals in the presence of another person with reckless disregard for the offensive, insulting, or frightening effect the act may have.

Indecent exposure in the second degree before a person under 16 years of age is a class A misdemeanor. Indecent exposure in the second degree before a person 16 years of age or older is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 81 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intentionally,” “recklessly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Disorderly conduct - AS

11.61.110(a)(7)

Statute of limitations in prosecutions under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

- AS

12.10.020(c)

Original Code Provision - AS 11.40.080.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors,
and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

.

Sec. 11.41.468.
Forfeiture of property used in sexual offense.

Property used to aid a violation of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.458

or to aid the solicitation of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit a violation of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.458

may be forfeited to the state upon the conviction of the offender.

In this section, “property” means computer equipment, telecommunications equipment, photography equipment, video or audio equipment, books, magazines, photographs, videotapes, audiotapes, and any equipment or device, regardless of format or technology employed, that can be used to store, create, modify, receive, transmit, or distribute digital or analog information, including images, motion pictures, and sounds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 41 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent applicable to this section, see § 1, ch. 41, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.